Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1167.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 9, chapter 4, article 8, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 9-500.54, to read: START_STATUTE9-500.54. Notices; posting requirements; official website; applicability A. Notwithstanding any other law, A city or town may satisfy any statutory requirement for advertising, publishing or printing required by this title by posting the advertisement, publication or printing on the official website of the city or town and on the official website of a newspaper that is qualified to publish notices under this title. B. To satisfy the posting requirements prescribed by subsection A of this section, a city or town shall electronically provide the newspaper with the notice that is to be posted on the official website of the newspaper at least one full business day before the required notice date. The city or town shall post the notice on the official website of the city or town by the required notice date. C. A city or town that posts public notices on the official website of the city or town shall include a public notices link on the home page of the website of the city or town that links to all statutorily required advertising, publishing or printing, listed by category. D. This section does not apply to publishing a notice of a proposed charter as required by section 9-282. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Title 11, chapter 2, article 4, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 11-269.31, to read: START_STATUTE11-269.31. Notices; posting requirements; official website A. Notwithstanding any other law, A county may satisfy any statutory requirement for advertising, publishing or printing required by this title by posting the advertisement, publication or printing on the official website of the county and on the official website of a newspaper that is qualified to publish notices under this title. B. To satisfy the posting requirements prescribed by subsection A of this section, a county shall electronically provide the newspaper with the notice that is to be posted on the official website of the newspaper at least one full business day before the required notice date.  The county shall post the notice on the official website of the county by the required notice date. C. A county that posts public notices on the official website of the county shall include a public notices link on the home page of the website of the county that links to all statutorily required advertising, publishing or printing, listed by category. END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 19, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 22, 2026.